Massachusetts, session 194th, H3242.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after clause
Twenty-second D, inserted by chapter 260 of the acts of 2022, the following clause:-
Twenty-second I, Real estate to the full amount of the taxable valuation of real property
of members of the National Guard or National Guard reservists who were domiciled in the
commonwealth for at least 6 months before entering service or who were domiciled in the
commonwealth for 5 consecutive years next before the date for filing for exemption under this
clause, which is occupied by them or their spouse as their domicile for any period of active
National Guard service outside the commonwealth plus 180 days; provided, however, that if
more than 1 period of active duty outside the commonwealth is performed during the year, the
additional 180 days shall be added to only 1 such period of active duty.
of 2

No real estate shall be so exempt which has been conveyed to evade taxation. Three-
quarters of the amount of the exemption shall be borne by the commonwealth, and the state
treasurer shall annually reimburse the city or town for such portion of the tax which otherwise
would have been collected for this exemption.
of 2